Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2057.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5075YH (3) 91 ak/ko H.F. 2057 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 135.196 Pediatric cancer research 1 ââ appropriation. 2 For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and for each 3 fiscal year thereafter, there is appropriated from the general 4 fund of the state to the state board of regents an amount 5 equal to one dollar per resident of the state on July 1 of the 6 same fiscal year, based on the most recent annual population 7 estimate issued by the United States census bureau, not to 8 exceed three million dollars per fiscal year, to be used 9 for pediatric cancer research including but not limited to 10 laboratory research and clinical trials at the university of 11 Iowa hospitals and clinics. Moneys appropriated under this 12 section shall not be used for administrative or overhead 13 costs, or activities not directly related to pediatric cancer 14 research. The state board of regents shall submit an annual 15 report to the governor and the general assembly by October 16 1 detailing how the appropriated moneys were used in the 17 immediately preceding fiscal year. 18